src/pron-kom-morph.txt
! ========================================================================== !
!                           Pronominal morphology                            !
! ========================================================================== !

! Closed class personal pronouns
! ------------------------------

LEXICON PERS
ме+Pron+Pers+Sg1: perssg1decl ;
тэ+Pron+Pers+Sg2: perssg2decl ; 
сійӧ+Pron+Pers+Sg3: perssg3decl ;
ми+Pron+Pers+Pl1: perspl1decl ;
ті+Pron+Pers+Pl2: perspl2decl ; 
найӧ+Pron+Pers+Pl3: perspl3decl ;


LEXICON perssg1decl
+Nom:ме # ;
+Cmpl:ме # ; !Postposition complement
+GenStem:менам # ;
+Cmpl+Gen:мелӧн # ;
+GenStem+Gen:менамлӧн # ;
+Ela+PxSg1:менсьым # ; !The elative case is used in Sg1 and Sg2 
                 !for the functions of the ablative in other persons
+Dat:меным # ; !What should be done with the 4 dative forms?
+Dat:мем # ;
+Dat:мен # ;
+Dat:менлы # ;
+Acc:менӧ # ;
+GenStem+Instr:менамӧн # ;
+GenStem+Com:менамкӧд # ;
+GenStem+Car:менамтӧг # ;
+GenStem+Inе:менамын # ;
+GenStem+Ela:менамысь # ;
+GenStem+Ill:менамӧ # ;
+GenStem+Apr:менамсянь # ;
+GenStem+Ter:менамӧдз # ;
+Cmpl:ме perssg ; ! for the regular obl sg

LEXICON perspl1decl
+Nom:ми # ;
+Der/йӧ+Nom:мийӧ # ;
+GenStem:миян # ;
+Acc:миянӧс # ;
+GenStem:миян persplobl ;
!!Extras form 2000 Grammar: 163
+GenStem+Gen:миянлӧн # ; !Synomymous with: миян
+GenStem+PxPl1+Acc:мияннымӧс # ; !Synomymous with: миянӧс
+GenStem+Ela+PxPl1:миянсьыным # ; !Synomymous with:миянлысь
+Com:микӧд # ; !Synomymous with: миянкӧд
+GenStem+PxPl1+Com:мияннымкӧд # ; !Synomymous with: миянкӧд
+Car:митӧг # ; !Synomymous with: миянтӧг
+GenStem+Car+PxPl1:миянтӧгным # ; !Synomymous with: миянтӧг
+GenStem+PxPl1+Cns:мияннымла # ; !Synomymous with: миянла
+Ela:миысь # ; !Synomymous with: миянысь
+Ill:миӧ # ; !Synomymous with: миянӧ
+GenStem+Apr+PxPl1:миянланьным # ; !Synomymous with: миянлань
+Apr+PxPl1:миланьным # ; !Synomymous with: миянлань
+GenStem+Egr+PxPl1:миянсяньным # ; !Synomymous with: миянсянь
+Tra:миті # ; !Synomymous with: миянӧд
+Ter:миӧдз # ; !Synomymous with: миянӧдз

LEXICON perssg2decl
+Nom:тэ # ;
+Cmpl:тэ # ;
+Cmpl+Gen:тэлӧн # ;
+GenStem:тэнад # ;
+GenStem+Gen:тэнадлӧн # ;
+Ela+PxSg2:тэнсьыд # ;
+Dat:тэныд # ;
+Dat:тэн # ;
+Dat:тэд # ;
+Dat:тэдлы # ;
+Dat:тэнлы # ;
+Dat:тэныдлы # ;
+Acc:тэнӧ # ;
+GenStem+Instr:тэнадӧн # ;
+GenStem+Com:тэнакӧд # ;
+GenStem+Car:тэнатӧг # ;
+GenStem+Ine:тэнадын # ;
+GenStem+Ela:тэнадысь # ;
+GenStem+Ill:тэнадӧ # ;
+GenStem+Egr:тэнадсянь # ;
+GenStem+Ter:тэнадӧдз # ;
+Cmpl:тэ perssg ;  ! for the regular obl sg

LEXICON perspl2decl
+Nom:ті # ;
+Cmpl:ті # ;
+Der/йӧ+Nom:тійӧ # ; !We need a special tag for discerning +Nom forms
+GenStem:тіян # ;
+GenStem+Gen:тіянлӧн # ;
+Acc:тіянӧс # ;
+GenStem:тіян persplobl ;
!More forms from Ӧнія коми кыв 2000: 163
+GenStem+Abl+PxPl2:тіянлысьныд # ;
+GenStem+Dat:тіянлы # ;
+GenStem+PxPl2+PxSg2+Acc2:тіянныдтӧ # ;
+Instr:тіӧн # ;
+GenStem+PxPl2+Car:тіянныдтӧг # ;
+Car:тітӧг # ;
+GenStemPxPl2+Cns:тіянныдла # ;
+Ela:тіысь # ;
+Ill:тіӧ # ;
+GenStem+Apr+PxPl2:тіянланьныд # ;
+GenStem+Apr+PxSg2:тіянланьыд # ;
+GenStem+Egr+PxPl2:тіянсяньныд # ;
+Ter:тіӧдз # ;

LEXICON perssg3decl
+Der/йӧ+Nom:сійӧ # ;
+Cmpl+Gen:сылӧн # ;
+Cmpl+Abl:сылысь # ;
+Cmpl+Ela:сыысь # ;
+Cmpl+Dat:сылы # ;
+Der/йӧ+Acc:сійӧс # ;
+Der/йӧ+Instr:сійӧн # ;
+Cmpl:сы perssg ;  ! for the regular obl sg
+Cmpl:сы # ;
!More form ӧния коми кыв 163
+Der/йӧ+Gen:сійӧлӧн # ;
+Der/йӧ+Abl:сійӧлысь # ;
+Der/йӧ+Dat:сійӧлы # ;
+Der/йӧ+Com:сійӧкӧд # ;
+Der/йӧ+Car:сійӧтӧг # ;
+Der/йӧ+Apr:сійӧлань # ;
+Der/йӧ+Egr:сійӧсянь # ;
+Der/йӧ+Egr+PxSg3:сійӧсяньыс # ;
+Der/йӧ+Ter:сійӧӧдз # ;
! Special expressions
+Cmpl+Com+Instr:сыкӧдӧн # ; ! Ен сыкӧдӧн!

!!ми мийӧ The 1st and 2nd persons have Oblique case stem strategies
!! that differ from the 3rd person: 
!!ті тійӧ nämä ovat aivan eri asioita
!!сы сійӧ tosin joskus 

LEXICON perspl3decl
+Der/йӧ+Nom:найӧ # ;
+Der/йӧ+Acc:найӧс # ;
+Cmpl+Gen:налӧн # ;
+Cmpl:на persplobl ; !This might be one solution for the different stem types
+Cmpl:на # ;
!
+Der/йӧ+Gen:найӧлӧн # ;
+Der/йӧ+Abl:найӧлысь # ;
+Der/йӧ+Dat:найӧлы # ;
+Der/йӧ+Instr:найӧӧн # ;
+Der/йӧ+Com:найӧкӧд # ;
+Cmpl+Com:накӧдыс # ;
+Der/йӧ+Car:найӧтӧг # ;
+Cmpl+Car+PxSg3:натӧгыс # ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Cns:наысла # ;
+Cmpl+Ela+PxSg3:насьыс # ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Apr:наыслань # ;
+Cmpl+Apr+PxSg3:наланьыс # ;
+Cmpl+PxSg3+Egr:наыссянь # ;
+Cmpl+Egr+PxSg3:насяньыс # ;
+Cmpl+Tra+PxSg3:натіыс # ;
+Cmpl+Ter+PxSg3:наӧдзыс # ;


LEXICON perssg 
+Instr:ӧн # ;
+Com:кӧд # ;
+Car:тӧг # ;
+Cns:ла # ;
+Ine:ын # ;
+Ill:ӧ # ; !
+Ela:ысь # ;
+Apr:лань # ;
+Egr:сянь # ;
+Prl:ӧд # ;
+Tra:ті # ;
+Ter:ӧдз # ;
+Abl:лысь # ; !This is not attested for Sg1 and Sg2 in the 2000 Grammar



LEXICON persplobl
+Abl:лысь # ;
+Dat:лы # ;
+Acc:ӧс # ;

+Instr:ӧн # ;
+Com:кӧд # ;
+Car:тӧг # ;
+Cns:ла # ;
+Comp:ся # ;
+Ine:ын # ;
+Ela:ысь # ;
+Ill:ӧ # ;
+Apr:лань # ;
+Egr:сянь # ;
+Prl:ӧд # ;
+Tra:ті # ;
+Ter:ӧдз # ;
+Apr+Ine:ланьын # ;  ! New cases in last grammar  
+Apr+Ela:ланьысь # ;  ! 
+Apr+Ill:ланьӧ # ; ! 
+Apr+Egr:ланьсянь # ; ! 
+Apr+Prl:ланьӧд # ; !
+Apr+Tra:ланьті # ; !       
+Apr+Ter:ланьӧдз # ; ! 


! These ones to be removed:
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-COM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1-NOM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-COM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2-NOM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-COM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-ELA
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3-NOM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-ELA
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1-NOM ! tähän tulee ме
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-COM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ELA
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-NOM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2-ABL
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ACC
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-COM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-DAT
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ELA
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-GEN
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-NOM
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-ABL
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl: # ;
!!! LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3-OBL
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat:%>лы # ;
!!! +Pron+Pers+Sg3+Abl:%>лысь # ;


!Interrogative pronouns serve as the base of interrogative, relative, indefinite and distributional pronouns.

LEXICON PRON-HUM
+Pron+Sg+Nom:і INTERR-REL ;
+Pron+Pl+Nom:ъяс INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Pron+Sg+Nom: INTERR-REL-INDEF ;
+Pron+Sg: PRON-HUM-OBL ;
+Pron+Pl:ъяс PRON-HUM-OBL ;
+Pron: PRON-HUM-COLL ;
!код, коді

LEXICON INTERR
коді:код PRON-HUM ;
